District of Columbia statutes.
18-110

Opening will before delivery to Probate Court.

A person having possession or custody of a testamentary instrument may, after the death of the testator, open and read it in the presence of near relatives of the deceased, who may conveniently have notice thereof, and of other persons, and immediately thereafter may deliver the will or codicil to the Probate Court or the Register of Wills, until proceedings may be held for the purpose of proving it or other action is taken thereon.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 687, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 18-110.
1973 Ed., § 18-110.